Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-2] Voluntary severance benefit.
(a) Any employee entitled to reduction-in-force rights under chapter 89 and
who receives official notification that the employee's position is being
abolished or who is directly affected by a reduction-in-force or workforce
restructuring plan, including privatization, may elect to receive a voluntary
severance benefit provided under this section in lieu of exercising any
reduction-in-force rights under chapter 89 and in lieu of receiving any special
retirement benefit under section 89E-3.

(b) A one-time lump sum cash bonus severance
benefit shall be calculated at five per cent of the employee's base salary for
every year of service worked, not to exceed ten years, and shall not exceed
fifty per cent of the employee's annual base salary.

For the purposes of this section, "annual
base salary" means an employee's annual salary for the position from which
the employee is to be separated, excluding all other forms of compensation paid
or accrued, whether a bonus, allowance, differential, or value of leave or
compensatory time off credits. Compensation excluded from base salary includes
shortage category differential, night shift differential, overtime,
compensatory time off credits, vacation or sick leave credits, and workers'
compensation benefits.

(c) A severance benefit shall be in addition
to any payment owing to the employee upon separation from service, including
accumulated unused vacation allowances or compensatory time credits.

(d) All severance benefits paid under this
section shall be subject to applicable state income tax laws and rules.

(e) A severance benefit provided under this
section shall not be considered as a part of a discharged employee's salary,
service credit, or a cost item as defined in section 89-2 when calculating
retirement benefits or sick and vacation leave. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next